Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 2 Facsimile Seals and Signatures

§ 16-2-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Authorized officer” means any official of this state or any of its departments, agencies or other instrumentalities or any of its political subdivisions whose signature to a public security or instrument of payment is required or permitted;

“Facsimile signature” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping or other means of the manual signature of an authorized officer;

“Instrument of payment” means a check, draft, warrant or order for the payment, delivery or transfer of funds;

“Public security” means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any of its departments, agencies or other instrumentalities or by any of its political subdivisions;

“This act” means W.S.

16-2-101

through

16-2-103

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-123; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “16-2-103” for “16-2-104.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 16-2-102.
Facsimile signature; authorized use; legal effect.

After filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, any authorized officer may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature:

Any public security, provided that at least one (1) signature required or permitted to be placed thereon shall be manually subscribed; and

Any instrument of payment.

Upon compliance with this act by the authorized officer, his facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his manual signature.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 34, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-124; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to use of facsimile signature on refunding securities, see §

16-5-111

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 16-2-101(a)(v).

§ 16-2-103.
Facsimile seal of state; authorized use; legal effect.

When the seal of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions is required in the execution of a public security or instrument of payment, the authorized officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, stamped or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 34, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-125; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to use of facsimile seal on refunding securities, see §

16-5-111

.

§ 16-2-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1959, ch. 34, § 4, prohibited the fraudulent use of facsimile signature or seal.